Hawaii statutes.
[§468M-9.5] Record keeping requirements
for client trust accounts. (a) An activity desk shall maintain all books
and records necessary to comply with this chapter and any rules adopted
pursuant to this chapter and shall make all records relating to client trust
accounts available for inspection and audit within three business days of a
written request by the director. Nothing in this section shall prevent the
director from inspecting or auditing the books and records of an activity desk
as otherwise provided in this chapter or rules adopted by the director pursuant
to chapter 91.

(b) An activity desk shall keep and maintain copies
of all bank statements, deposit slips, canceled checks, drafts, and wire or
electronic transaction documents relating to client trust accounts for a period
of at least two years. [L 2010, c 150, §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next